Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Subchapter 4. Regional Development

§ 4361.
Repealed.
1981, No. 132 (Adj. Sess.), § 18.

§ 4362.
Appropriations.

For the purposes outlined in subdivisions 4345(6) and (12) of this title, regional planning commissions may receive and expend monies from any source, including the participating municipalities and the Agency of Commerce and Community Development, out of funds appropriated to that Agency for this purpose. Municipalities may appropriate to and expend funds for regional planning commissions for this purpose. Direct financial assistance from the State to regional planning commissions for the purposes outlined in subdivisions 4345(6) and (12) of this title is restricted to 50 percent of the annual operating expenses of the commission.

Regional planning commissions requesting State aid from the Agency of Commerce and Community Development shall submit annual reports to the Agency of their activities and shall comply with such rules, regulations, and standards as the Agency shall prescribe to determine eligibility for State financial assistance, and, further, shall submit to the Agency, or must be in the process of preparing, a program for the economic development of the region that is consistent with the regional plan for the region that has been adopted or that is in the process of preparation.

HISTORY:

Added

1967, No. 334

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. March 23, 1968; amended

1971, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. April 11, 1972;

1995, No. 190

(Adj. Sess.), § 1(a);

2019, No. 14

, § 67, eff. April 30, 2019.